Illinois, session 104th, HB246.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 5Program Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 130/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act.9(Source: P.A. 101-363, eff. 8-9-19.)